Hawaii statutes.
§481-26 Penalty. Any person who sells
goods in violation of this part shall be fined not more than $50, and each such
sale shall constitute a separate offense. [L 1945, c 214, §6; RL 1955, §205-45;
HRS §481-26]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next